Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-950
Continuances; liberally granted.

Continuances shall be liberally granted at the request of the subject. Continuances may be granted to permit the subject to obtain voluntary treatment at a private facility.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 64;

Laws 1985, LB 252, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1054;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 70.